Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-108
Colleges; government; program of instruction; approval.

The immediate government of each college shall be by its own faculty, which shall consist of the professors therein, but no program of instruction shall be adopted without approval of the program in the manner prescribed by the Board of Regents.

Laws 1869, § 13, p. 176;

R.S.1913, § 7091;

C.S.1922, § 6723;

C.S.1929, § 85-110;

R.S.1943, § 85-108;

Laws 2003, LB 68, § 3.